Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Managed Care Plan Network Adequacy Act:

(1) Closed plan means a managed care plan that requires a covered person to use participating providers under the terms of the managed care plan;

(2) Covered benefits or benefits means those health care services to which a covered person is entitled under the terms of a health benefit plan;

(3) Covered person means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee, or other individual participating in a health benefit plan;

(4) Director means the Director of Insurance;

(5) Emergency medical condition means a medical or behavioral condition, the onset of which is sudden, that manifests itself by symptoms of sufficient severity, including, but not limited to, severe pain, that a prudent layperson, possessing an average knowledge of medicine and health, could reasonably expect the absence of immediate medical attention to result in (a) placing the health of the person afflicted with such condition in serious jeopardy or, in the case of a behavioral condition, placing the health of such persons or others in serious jeopardy, (b) serious impairment to such person's bodily functions, (c) serious impairment of any bodily organ or part of such person, or (d) serious disfigurement of such person;

(6) Emergency services means health care services necessary to screen and stabilize a covered person in connection with an emergency medical condition;

(7) Facility means an institution providing health care services or a health care setting, including, but not limited to, hospitals and other licensed inpatient centers, ambulatory surgical or treatment centers, skilled nursing centers, residential treatment centers, diagnostic, laboratory, and imaging centers, and rehabilitation and other therapeutic health settings. Facility does not include physicians' offices;

(8) Health benefit plan means a policy, contract, certificate, or agreement entered into, offered, or issued by any person to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of health care services. Health benefit plan does not include workers' compensation insurance coverage;

(9) Health care professional means a physician or other health care practitioner licensed, certified, or registered to perform specified health services consistent with state law;

(10) Health care provider or provider means a health care professional or a facility;

(11) Health care services or health services means services for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition, illness, injury, or disease;

(12) Health carrier means an entity that contracts, offers to contract, or enters into an agreement to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of health care services, including a sickness and accident insurance company, a health maintenance organization, a prepaid limited health service organization, a prepaid dental service corporation, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance, health benefits, or health care services. Health carrier does not include a workers' compensation insurer, risk management pool, or self-insured employer who contracts for services to be provided through a managed care plan certified pursuant to section 48-120.02;

(13) Intermediary means a person authorized to negotiate and execute provider contracts with health carriers on behalf of health care providers or on behalf of a network;

(14) Managed care plan means a health benefit plan, including closed plans and open plans, that either requires a covered person to use or creates financial incentives by providing a more favorable deductible, coinsurance, or copayment level for a covered person to use health care providers managed, owned, under contract with, or employed by the health carrier;

(15) Network means the group of participating providers providing services to a managed care plan;

(16) Open plan means a managed care plan other than a closed plan that provides incentives, including financial incentives, for covered persons to use participating providers under the terms of the managed care plan;

(17) Participating provider means a provider who, under a contract with the health carrier or with its contractor or subcontractor, has agreed to provide health care services to covered persons with an expectation of receiving payment, other than coinsurance, copayments, or deductibles, directly or indirectly from the health carrier;

(18) Person means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, an association, a joint venture, a joint-stock company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, any similar entity, or any combination of the foregoing;

(19) Primary care professional means a participating health care professional designated by the health carrier to supervise, coordinate, or provide initial care or continuing care to a covered person and who may be required by the health carrier to initiate a referral for specialty care and maintain supervision of health care services rendered to the covered person; and

(20) Stabilize means when, with respect to transfer to another facility, the examining physician at a hospital emergency department where an individual has sought treatment for an emergency medical condition has determined, within reasonable medical probability:

(a) With respect to an emergency medical condition, that no material deterioration of the condition is likely to result from or occur during a transfer of the individual from the facility; and

(b) The receiving facility has available space and qualified personnel for the treatment of the individual and has agreed to accept transfer of the individual and provide appropriate medical treatment.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 41.